Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 4 Appointment as Senior Judge; Compensation and Duties

47-8-60.
Appointment to the office of senior judge; resignation from the office of superior court judge.

The Governor shall appoint to the position of senior judge anyone eligible under this chapter who advises the Governor in writing that he desires to resign from the office of judge of the superior courts and accept appointment as a senior judge. Upon such appointment by the Governor and issuance of the commission by the Governor, the resignation shall automatically become effective.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 3.

47-8-61.
Term of office as senior judge; power of Governor to call upon senior judges to serve as superior court judges.

All persons appointed as senior judges under this chapter shall hold such office for life. The Governor may call upon such judges to serve as judges of the superior courts when the regular judge for some reason is unable to serve. Such judges are also authorized to serve in the superior courts as may be otherwise provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 363, § 5; Ga. L. 1951, p. 493, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 318, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 911, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 722, § 1.

47-8-62.
Salaries paid to senior judges.

Except as otherwise provided, a senior judge shall receive from the state an annual salary equal to two-thirds of the salary provided by law to be paid by the state to a judge of the superior court at the time of his appointment to the position of senior judge under this chapter. In addition to this salary, a senior judge shall receive from the counties of the circuit of which he had lately been judge a salary equal to two-thirds of the amounts which had been paid to him as judge by those counties at the time of his resignation as judge of the superior court and his appointment as senior judge.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 4.

47-8-63.
Duties of senior judges generally.

It shall be the duty of the senior judges to consult with the Justices of the Supreme Court and the Judges of the Court of Appeals and to advise and assist each of such courts in the revision of the rules of practice of such courts and in handling the administrative duties now or hereafter placed upon such courts or the members thereof by law. It shall also be the duty of the senior judges to consult with the Attorney General and the assistants to the Attorney General upon legal matters, when their advice and consultation are requested.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 7.

47-8-64.
Service as superior court judge; compensation.

Senior judges may serve as judges of the superior courts as provided for in Chapter 1 of Title 15 or as otherwise provided by law. A senior judge serving as judge of the superior court shall be compensated as provided for in Code Section 15-1-9.2 or as otherwise provided by laws enacted after July 1, 1989; and such compensation for such service shall not affect, diminish, or otherwise impair the payment or receipt of any retirement or pension benefits of such judge.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 547, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1970, p. 204, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1973, p. 911, § 4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 586, § 37; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1386, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 832, § 2.

Cross references.

Judge’s exercise of judicial power in any court upon request of that court’s judges, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. I, Para. III.

Requesting judicial assistance from other courts generally, §

15-1-9.1

.

47-8-65.
Retention of office as a senior judge despite nonresidency; power to preside as a judge during the period of nonresidence.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any person who has been appointed to the office of senior judge under this chapter and who is (1) 65 years of age or older or (2) any person who, after being appointed to the office of senior judge under this chapter, becomes disabled from continuing his official duties as a senior judge may become a nonresident of this state and may upon a doctor’s order retain his office as a senior judge despite his nonresidence in the state and may continue to receive his retirement salary as a senior judge under this chapter. The disability of a senior judge shall be determined under the procedure specified in subsection (c) of Code Section 47-8-40.

No senior judge who is a nonresident of the state shall preside in any court of this state while a nonresident.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 458, § 1.

47-8-66.
[Reserved] Suspension of appointment to the office of senior judge while eligible for or holding an office of profit or trust under the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 161, § 2, and Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; repealed by Ga. L. 1994, p. 722, § 2, effective July 1, 1994.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 722, § 2 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1994.

47-8-67.
Election of survivors benefits coverage; contributions required for such coverage; effect of such coverage on appointment to the office of senior judge; amount of survivors benefits.

Any superior court judge holding office on March 11, 1970, shall have the option, which must be exercised, if at all, by not later than July 1, 1970, of electing to have his surviving spouse receive for the remainder of her life a benefit which, except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, shall be equal to the salary such judge would have received had he lived and been appointed senior judge, subject to the following conditions:

Any judge so electing shall pay an amount equal to 2 percent of his or her state salary for each year of prior service as a judge of superior court up to the time of such election and shall thereafter contribute, in addition to the 5 percent contribution required by this chapter, 2 percent of the salary paid to him or her by the state. Such amount shall be deducted from such salary by The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia and deposited into the retirement fund; and

Any judge so electing shall not be eligible for appointment as senior judge until he is at least 60 years of age, except that he may be appointed senior judge before reaching such age as a result of disability as provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 47-8-40.

Any person who becomes a superior court judge after June 30, 1968, and who is eligible for appointment as senior judge shall have the option provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, which must be exercised, if at all, within 60 days after becoming a superior court judge. All requirements and other provisions of this Code section shall apply to any superior court judge exercising this option.

Upon the death of any superior court judge who has made the election provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section and who was at the time of his death (1) serving as a senior judge, (2) eligible for appointment as a senior judge, or (3) otherwise eligible for appointment as a senior judge except for not having attained age 60, his surviving spouse shall receive for the remainder of her life a monthly benefit equal to the salary as a senior judge which he was drawing or which he was eligible to draw at the time of his death or which he would have been eligible to draw had he lived and been appointed a senior judge, provided that if his surviving spouse is younger than such judge and has not been married to him for at least 20 years, the benefit paid to the surviving spouse shall be converted to the actuarial equivalent on the age attained by the surviving spouse at the time of the judge’s death based on actuarial tables adopted by the trustees of the fund as recommended by an actuary selected by such trustees.

No provision of this chapter shall be construed so as to require any superior court judge exercising the option provided by this Code section to be holding office as a superior court judge in order to be eligible for appointment as a senior judge; and, if otherwise qualified in accordance with this chapter, any such judge shall be entitled to be appointed as a senior judge, subject to the requirements of this Code section, whether or not he is holding office at the time of his appointment.

Any superior court judge who has elected to exercise the option provided for in this Code section shall have until July 1, 1970, to rescind such action and to withdraw from the program of benefits provided for in this Code section. If any superior court judge elects to rescind such action, he shall so notify the trustees of the fund, in writing, prior to July 1, 1970. If such action is rescinded, there shall be refunded to any such judge all contributions which he has made toward the program of benefits, less any administrative costs and expenses incurred by the fund and less any costs and expenses for any accrued benefits enjoyed by any such superior court judge during his participation in the program prior to his withdrawal.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 275, § 2; Ga. L. 1970, p. 249, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1973, p. 785, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 8/SB 109; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in paragraph (a)(1), inserted “or her” twice in the first sentence and substituted “Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia” for “commissioner of administrative services” in the last sentence.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “The Council” for “the Council” in the second sentence of paragraph (a)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-8-68.
Withdrawal of payments to the fund; effect on right to participate in the fund.

Any superior court judge may, after 30 days’ written notice to the trustees of this fund, withdraw his total payments, without interest, from the fund; and his right to participate in the benefits under this chapter shall cease, unless the age of such judge is such that he could resume payments for a period of 20 continuous years.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 14.

47-8-69.
Withdrawal of payments to the fund by superior court judges who have been disqualified or resigned from office; payments upon the death of a superior court judge.

Any superior court judge who resigns or otherwise becomes disqualified to hold such office shall be entitled to withdraw the total amount, without interest, which he has paid to the fund. If any such judge dies, the total amount, without interest, paid by him to the fund shall be paid to his surviving spouse or, if none, to his personal representative. In the case of any such judge who was receiving benefits from this fund at the time of his death and who has not received the total amount, without interest, paid by him to the fund, his surviving spouse or, if none, his personal representative shall receive from the fund the remainder of his payments to the fund. The employee contributions paid by the employer to the fund on behalf of a judge of the superior courts, as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 47-8-44, after July 1, 1980, shall be considered to be payments made by the judge.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 15; Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, § 13; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.